Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 12 RAIL DISTRICT ACT
32-12-117. Debt question submitted to eligible electors - resolution.

Whenever the board determines by resolution that the interest of the rail district and the public interest or necessity demand the acquisition, construction, installation, or completion of any work or other improvements or facilities, or the making of any contract to carry out the objects or purposes of the rail district which requires the creation of any indebtedness of the rail district, the board shall order the submission of the proposition of incurring the indebtedness to the eligible electors of the rail district at an election held for that purpose. Any such election may be held separately or may be held jointly or concurrently with any other election authorized by this article.

The declaration of public interest or necessity required and the provision for the holding of the election may be included within the same resolution, which resolution, in addition to the declaration of public interest or necessity, shall recite the objects and purposes for which the indebtedness is proposed to be incurred, the estimated cost of the works, improvements, or facilities, as the case may be, the principal amount of the indebtedness to be incurred therefor, and the maximum net effective interest rate to be paid on the indebtedness. The resolution shall also fix the date of the election and shall name a designated election official who shall be responsible for conducting the election pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 514, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 922, § 191, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-118. Effect - subsequent elections.

If any proposition authorized by section 32-12-117 is approved by a majority of electors voting thereon, the rail district shall thereupon be authorized to incur such indebtedness or obligations, enter into such contracts, or issue and sell such bonds of the rail district, as the case may be, all for the purposes and objects provided for in the proposition submitted under said section, in the amount so provided, and at a price and at a rate of interest such that the maximum net effective interest rate recited in the resolution is not exceeded. Submission of the proposition of incurring such obligation or bonded or other indebtedness at such an election shall not prevent or prohibit submission of the same or other propositions at subsequent elections called for such purpose, but no new election creating an indebtedness may be held within one hundred twenty days after the date of the election at which a proposal was defeated. No more than two such elections may be held within any twelve-month period.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 515, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-119. Correction of faulty notices.

In any case where a notice is provided for in this article, if the court or the board reviewing the proceedings finds for any reason that due notice was not given, said body shall not thereby lose jurisdiction, and the proceedings in question shall not thereby be void or be abated, but said body shall order due notice to be given, shall continue the proceeding until such time as notice is properly given, and thereupon shall proceed as though notice had been properly given in the first instance.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 515, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-120. Refunding bonds.

Any bonds issued by any rail district may be refunded without an election as provided in article 56 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 515, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-121. Anticipation warrants.

The board may defray any costs of the rail district by the issuance of notes or warrants to evidence the amount due therefor, in anticipation of taxes or revenues or both. Interest on such notes or warrants shall be governed by the provisions of section 5-12-104, C.R.S. Notes and warrants may mature at such time not exceeding one year from their date of issuance as the board may determine. If such notes or warrants are not paid during the fiscal year in which they are issued, the board shall, at the end of its fiscal year, budget the amount necessary to pay in full the amount of notes and warrants outstanding and due during the next fiscal year.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 515, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-122. Inclusion of additional territory in existing rail district - procedures.

Proceedings for inclusion of a portion of a county or portions of two or more counties or an entire additional county, counties, or a municipality, or portion thereof, in a rail district shall be in accordance with the provisions of part 4 of article 1 of this title, subject to the provisions of this article. Inclusion may be initiated by petitions signed by eligible electors in an amount equal to at least five percent of the total number of electors who cast votes in the area seeking to be included for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the last preceding general election.

The board shall initiate negotiations for the purchase and operation of the additional rail facilities in the newly included area.

If negotiations fail to acquire any additional authorized railroad facilities, upon petition by the board, the court shall order the newly expanded portion of the rail district excluded.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 515, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 923, § 192, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-123. Grant of operating privileges and use of railroad and facilities.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan, or agreement authorized by this article, a rail district may by contract, lease, or otherwise, for such consideration and term as it may determine, grant to any person the privilege of operating or using any railroad or railroad facilities or property owned or controlled by the rail district. No person may be granted any authority to operate a railroad other than as a common carrier or switching service.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 516, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-124. Arrangements for operating and providing railroad service.

The rail district may enter into contracts, leases, and other arrangements for such term as the rail district may determine with any persons:

Granting the privilege of using or improving the railroad or any portion or facility or space for commercial purposes;

Conferring the privilege of supplying goods, commodities, services, or facilities along the railroad;

Making available services to be furnished by the rail district or its agents.

In each case the district may establish the terms and conditions and fix the charges, rentals, or fees for the privileges or services, which shall be reasonable and uniform for the same class of privilege or service.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 516, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-125. Public purpose and necessity for acquisitions.

Any land and other property and privileges acquired and used by or on behalf of any rail district are hereby declared to be acquired and used for public and governmental purposes and as a matter of public necessity; however, public utilities may acquire rights-of-way across or along such land in accordance with their powers of eminent domain.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 516, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-126. Disposition of property of rail district.

Except as may be limited by the terms and conditions of any grant, loan, or agreement made or received by the rail district, a rail district may, by sale, lease, or otherwise, dispose of any of its property or portion thereof or interest therein.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 516, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-127. Dissolution.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, a rail district may be dissolved in a manner pursuant, as nearly as practicable, to the provisions of part 7 of article 1 of this title. Dissolution may be initiated by petitions signed by eligible electors in an amount equal to at least five percent of the total number of electors who cast votes within the rail district for all candidates for the office of secretary of state at the last preceding general election. No dissolution shall be effected unless approved by a majority of the eligible electors of the rail district voting thereon and unless satisfactory arrangements have been made for payment of any obligations or debts and for the continuation of any services essential for the health, welfare, and safety of residents of the rail district.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 516, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 923, § 193, effective January 1, 1993.

32-12-128. Early hearings.

All court actions involving the validity of any proceeding under this article which is a matter of immediate public interest and concern shall be advanced and heard at the earliest practical moment.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 517, § 1, effective April 23.

32-12-129. Elections.

Elections shall be conducted pursuant to articles 1 to 13 of title 1, C.R.S.

All necessary expenses of any rail district regular special district election or special election subsequent to the organization of the rail district and other proceedings conducted pursuant to the election shall be paid by the rail district.

Source:

L. 82:

Entire article added, p. 517, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 923, § 194, effective January 1, 1993.